ro-RO: Sistem de acordare pentru muzicuță: Acordaj circular; Acordaj country; Minor armonic; Melody maker; Minor natural; Acordaj de orchestră; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Acordaj solo; Acordaj vienez; Altele
nb: Stemmesystem for munnspill: Sirkulær stemming; Country-stemming; Harmonisk moll; Melody maker; Naturlig moll; Orkesterstemming; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solostemming; Wiener-stemming; Annet
fi: Huuliharpun viritysjärjestelmä: Kiertoviritys; Country-viritys; Harmoninen molli; Melody maker; Luonnollinen molli; Orkesteriviritys; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Sooloviritys; Wiener-viritys; Muu
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος φυσαρμόνικας: Κυκλικό κούρδισμα; Κούρδισμα Country; Αρμονικό μινόρε; Melody maker; Φυσικό μινόρε; Ορχηστρικό κούρδισμα; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Σόλο κούρδισμα; Κούρδισμα Wiener; Άλλο
hr-HR: Sustav ugađanja harmonike: Kružno ugađanje; Country ugađanje; Harmonijski mol; Melody maker; Prirodni mol; Orkestralno ugađanje; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solo ugađanje; Bečko ugađanje; Ostalo
it: Sistema di accordatura dell'armonica: Accordatura circolare; Accordatura country; Minore armonica; Melody maker; Minore naturale; Accordatura orchestra; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Accordatura solista; Accordatura viennese; Altro
sk-SK: Systém ladenia harmoniky: Kruhové ladenie; Country ladenie; Harmonická molová; Melody maker; Prirodzená molová; Orchestrálne ladenie; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Sólové ladenie; Viedenské ladenie; Iné
sv: Stämningssystem för munspel: Cirkulär stämning; Country-stämning; Harmonisk moll; Melody maker; Naturlig moll; Orkesterstämning; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solostämning; Wienerstämning; Övrigt
pt-BR: Sistema de afinação da gaita: Afinação circular; Afinação country; Menor harmônica; Melody maker; Menor natural; Afinação de orquestra; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Afinação solo; Afinação Wiener; Outro
cs: Systém ladění harmoniky: Kruhové ladění; Country ladění; Harmonická moll; Melody maker; Přirozená moll; Orchestrální ladění; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Sólové ladění; Vídeňské ladění; Jiné
es: Sistema de afinación de la armónica: Afinación circular; Afinación country; Menor armónica; Melody maker; Menor natural; Afinación de orquesta; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Afinación solista; Afinación vienesa; Otro
ru: Система настройки гармоники: Круговая настройка; Строй кантри; Гармонический минор; Строй Melody Maker; Натуральный минор; Оркестровый строй; Строй Пэдди Рихтера; PowerBender; Строй Рихтера; Сольный строй; Венский строй; Другое
ko: 하모니카 튜닝 시스템: 서큘러 튜닝; 컨트리 튜닝; 하모닉 마이너; 멜로디 메이커; 내추럴 마이너; 오케스트라 튜닝; 패디 릭터; 파워벤더; 릭터; 솔로 튜닝; 비엔나 튜닝; 기타
fr: Système d'accordage d'harmonica: Accordage circulaire; Accordage country; Mineur harmonique; Melody Maker; Mineur naturel; Accordage orchestre; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Accordage solo; Accordage viennois; Autre
hu: Harmonika hangolórendszere: Körkörös hangolás; Country hangolás; Harmonikus moll; Melody Maker; Természetes moll; Zenekari hangolás; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Szóló hangolás; Bécsi hangolás; Egyéb
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação da harmónica: Afinação circular; Afinação country; Menor harmónica; Melody Maker; Menor natural; Afinação orquestral; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Afinação a solo; Afinação Wiener; Outra
nl: Stemsysteem harmonica: Circulaire stemming; Country-stemming; Harmonisch mineur; Melody maker; Natuurlijk mineur; Orkeststemming; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solostemming; Weense stemming; Overig
en: Harmonica tuning system: Circular tuning; Country tuning; Harmonic minor; Melody maker; Natural minor; Orchestra tuning; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solo tuning; Wiener tuning; Other
zh-CN: 口琴调音系统: 循环调音; 乡村调音; 和声小调; Melody Maker 调音; 自然小调; 管弦乐调音; Paddy Richter 调音; PowerBender 调音; 里希特调音; 独奏调音; 维也纳调音; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem uglasitve ustne harmonike: Krožna uglasitev; Country uglasitev; Harmonični mol; Melody Maker; Naravni mol; Orkestralna uglasitev; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solo uglasitev; Dunajska uglasitev; Drugo
zh-TW: 口琴調音系統: 循環調音; 鄉村調音; 和聲小調; 旋律製造者調音; 自然小調; 管弦樂調音; 派迪理希特調音 (Paddy Richter); PowerBender; 理希特調音 (Richter); 獨奏調音; 維也納調音; 其他
pl: System strojenia harmonijki: Strój kołowy; Strój country; Strój mollowy harmoniczny; Melody maker; Strój mollowy naturalny; Strój orkiestrowy; Strój Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Strój Richtera; Strój solowy; Strój wiedeński; Inny
bg-BG: Система за настройка на хармониката: Кръгова настройка; Кънтри настройка; Хармоничен минор; Мелоди мейкър; Естествен минор; Оркестрова настройка; Пади Рихтер; PowerBender; Рихтер; Соло настройка; Виенска настройка; Друго
ja: ハーモニカチューニングシステム: サーキュラーチューニング; カントリーチューニング; ハーモニックマイナー; メロディメーカー; ナチュラルマイナー; オーケストラチューニング; パディリヒター; パワーベンダー; リヒター; ソロチューニング; ウィーンチューニング; その他
de: Stimmsystem für Mundharmonika: Zirkuläre Stimmung; Country-Stimmung; Harmonisch Moll; Melody Maker; Natürlich Moll; Orchesterstimmung; Paddy-Richter-Stimmung; PowerBender; Richter-Stimmung; Solo-Stimmung; Wiener Stimmung; Sonstige
vi: Hệ thống chỉnh âm của kèn harmonica: Chỉnh âm luân phiên; Chỉnh âm Country; Thứ hòa âm; Melody Maker; Thứ tự nhiên; Chỉnh âm Orchestra; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Chỉnh âm Solo; Chỉnh âm Wiener; Khác
th: ระบบการปรับเสียงฮาร์โมนิกา: จูนเสียงแบบ Circular; จูนเสียงแบบ Country; ฮาร์มอนิกไมเนอร์; เมโลดี้เมกเกอร์; เนเชอรัลไมเนอร์; จูนเสียงแบบ Orchestra; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; จูนเสียงแบบ Solo; จูนเสียงแบบ Wiener; อื่นๆ
da: Stemmesystem til mundharmonika: Cirkulær stemning; Country-stemning; Harmonisk mol; Melody maker; Ren mol; Orkesterstemning; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solostemning; Wienerstemning; Andet
tr: Mızıka akort sistemi: Dairesel akort; Country akordu; Harmonik minör; Melody maker; Doğal minör; Orkestra akordu; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Solo akort; Wiener akordu; Diğer
lt-LT: Lūpinės armonikėlės derinimo sistema: Žiedinis derinimas; Kantri derinimas; Harmoninis minoras; „Melody Maker“; Natūralusis minoras; Orkestro derinimas; „Paddy Richter“; „PowerBender“; Rihterio (Richter); Solo derinimas; Vienos derinimas (Wiener tuning); Kita